Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. General Administrative Provisions.

Sec. 47.05.010.
Duties of department.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall

administer adult public assistance, the Alaska temporary assistance program, and all other assistance programs, and receive and spend money made available to it;

adopt regulations necessary for the conduct of its business and for carrying out federal and state laws granting adult public assistance, temporary cash assistance, diversion payments, or self-sufficiency services for needy families under the Alaska temporary assistance program, and other assistance;

establish minimum standards for personnel employed by the department and adopt necessary regulations to maintain those standards;

require those bonds and undertakings from persons employed by it that, in its judgment, are necessary, and pay the premiums on them;

cooperate with the federal government in matters of mutual concern pertaining to adult public assistance, the Alaska temporary assistance program, and other forms of public assistance;

make the reports, in the form and containing the information, that the federal government from time to time requires;

cooperate with the federal government, its agencies, or instrumentalities in establishing, extending, and strengthening services for the protection and care of homeless, dependent, and neglected children in danger of becoming delinquent, and receive and expend funds available to the department by the federal government, the state, or its political subdivisions for that purpose;

cooperate with the federal government in adopting state plans to make the state eligible for federal matching in appropriate categories of assistance, and in all matters of mutual concern, including adoption of the methods of administration that are found by the federal government to be necessary for the efficient operation of welfare programs;

adopt regulations, not inconsistent with law, defining need, prescribing the conditions of eligibility for assistance, and establishing standards for determining the amount of assistance that an eligible person is entitled to receive; the amount of the assistance is sufficient when, added to all other income and resources available to an individual, it provides the individual with a reasonable subsistence compatible with health and well-being; an individual who meets the requirements for eligibility for assistance shall be granted the assistance promptly upon application for it;

grant to a person claiming or receiving assistance and who is aggrieved because of the department’s action or failure to act, reasonable notice and an opportunity for a fair hearing by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

), and the department shall adopt regulations relative to this;

enter into reciprocal agreements with other states relative to public assistance, welfare services, and institutional care that are considered advisable;

establish the requirements of residence for public assistance, welfare services, and institutional care that are considered advisable, subject to the limitations of other laws of the state, or law or regulation imposed as conditions for federal financial participation;

establish the divisions and local offices that are considered necessary or expedient to carry out a duty or authority assigned to it and appoint and employ the assistants and personnel that are necessary to carry on the work of the divisions and offices, and fix the compensation of the assistants or employees, except that a person engaged in business as a retail vendor of general merchandise, or a member of the immediate family of a person who is so engaged, may not serve as an acting, temporary, or permanent local agent of the department, unless the commissioner of health and social services certifies in writing to the governor, with relation to a particular community, that no other qualified person is available in the community to serve as local welfare agent; for the purposes of this paragraph, a “member of the immediate family” includes a spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, parent-in-law, brother-in-law, or sister-in-law;

provide education and health-related services and referrals designed to reduce the number of out-of-wedlock pregnancies and the number of induced pregnancy terminations in the state;

investigate reports of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property by certified nurse aides in facilities licensed by the department under AS 47.32;

establish state policy relating to and administer federal programs subject to state control as provided under 42 U.S.C. 3001 — 3058ee (Older Americans Act of 1965), as amended, and related federal regulations;

administer the older Alaskans service grants under AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

and the adult day care and family respite care grants under AS

47.65.100

;

actively seek to recruit quality foster parents and adoptive parents when a shortage of quality foster parents or adoptive parents exists.

History.

(§ 51-1-3(a) — (m) ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 175 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 136 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am §§ 120 — 122 ch 59 SLA 1982; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 138 SLA 1982; am § 6 ch 119 SLA 1984; am §§ 29 — 32 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 2 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 69 SLA 2002; am § 17 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2008; am E.O. No. 116, § 6 (2012); am § 2 ch 7 4SSLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For transition provisions for pending proceedings, rights, liabilities, or obligations under this section in effect on July 1, 2012, and regulations implementing this section in effect on July 1, 2012, see § 16, E.O. No. 116, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

For permanent fund dividend distribution, see 7 AAC 38.

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

For definitions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 5.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For physician services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 2.

For long-term care — intermediate care facilities and skilled nursing facilities, see 7 AAC 43, art. 3.

For intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded or persons with related conditions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 4.

For hospital services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 5.

For children’s services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 6.

For mental health services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 7.

For authorization of mental health rehabilitation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 8.

For medical transportation and accommodation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 9.

For inpatient psychiatric services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 10.

For prescribed drugs and medical supplies, see 7 AAC 43, art. 11.

For dental services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 12.

For visual care services and dispensing, see 7 AAC 43, art. 13.

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

For mental health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 15.

For rates for mental health services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 16.

For mental health rehabilitation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 17.

For substance abuse rehabilitative services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 18.

For consumer-directed and agency-based personal care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 19.

For home health care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 20.

For family planning services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 21.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For federally qualified health centers, see 7 AAC 43, art. 23.

For outpatient surgical clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 24.

For chiropractic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 25.

For other services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 26.

For program participation — administrative remedies and sanctions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 27.

For home and community-based waiver services; nursing facility and ICF/MR level of care, see 7 AAC 43, art. 28.

For home and community-based waiver services; residential psychiatric treatment center level of care, see 7 AAC 43, art. 29.

For telemedicine applications, see 7 AAC 43, art. 30.

For audit and appeal, see 7 AAC 43, art. 31.

For recovery of medicaid expenditures from recipients, see 7 AAC 43, art. 32.

For durable medical equipment and medical supplies; related services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 33.

For definitions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 34.

For federal heating assistance program, see 7 AAC 44, art. 1.

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

For senior benefits program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 3.

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

For catastrophic illness, see 7 AAC 48, art. 1.

For chronic and acute medical assistance, see 7 AAC 48, art. 2.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

For applicability, see 7 AAC 52, art. 1.

For admission to juvenile correctional facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 2.

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For program and treatment, see 7 AAC 52, art. 4.

For communications and visiting, see 7 AAC 52, art. 5.

For discipline, see 7 AAC 52, art. 6.

For supervision, see 7 AAC 52, art. 7.

For juvenile detention facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 8.

For child foster care payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 1.

For children in custody or under supervision: needs and income, see 7 AAC 53, art. 3.

For residential child care facility grants, see 7 AAC 53, art. 5.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

For grievance procedure, see 7 AAC 54, art. 2.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For family and youth services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 2.

For alcohol safety action program services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 3.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

For services to the blind or visually impaired, see 7 AAC 82.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

For common medicaid eligibility requirements, see 7 AAC 100, art. 1.

For family medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 2.

For transitional medicaid and extended medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 3.

For under-21 medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 4.

For medicaid for title IV-E adoption and foster care assistance recipients, see 7 AAC 100, art. 5.

For Denali kidcare: pregnant women and newborns, see 7 AAC 100, art. 6.

For Denali kidcare: poverty-level children, see 7 AAC 100, art. 7.

For medicaid eligibility for the aged and disabled, see 7 AAC 100, art. 8.

For long-term care medicaid eligibility, see 7 AAC 100, art. 9.

For long-term care medicaid post eligibility and cost of care, see 7 AAC 100, art. 10.

For medicaid treatment of trusts, see 7 AAC 100, art. 11.

For specialized medicaid eligibility categories, see 7 AAC 100, art. 12.

For medicare premium assistance categories, see 7 AAC 100, art. 13.

For recipient rights and responsibilities, and program integrity, see 7 AAC 100, art. 14.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference in paragraph (15).

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, added paragraphs (16) and (17).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (10), substituted “office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” for “department” following “for a fair hearing by the”.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 24, 2016, added (18), and made a related change.

Sec. 47.05.012.
Material incorporated by reference.

Under AS

44.62.245(a)(2)

, in adopting or amending a regulation that incorporates a document or other material by reference, the department may incorporate future amended versions of the document or other material if the document or other material is one of the following:

a document that is published, compiled, or prepared by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and is included in the following list:

the international classification of diseases, clinical modifications;

the common procedure coding system;

the specifications for national uniform billing data elements;

the federal poverty guidelines for the state;

the Indian Health Service encounter rates; or

the relative value units used in the Medicare program for determination of fee schedules;

the current procedural terminology for physicians published by the American Medical Association;

the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association;

the length of stay in hospitals by diagnosis and operation for the western region of the United States, published by Solucient;

the relative value guide published by the American Society of Anesthesiologists;

the consumer price index published by the United States Department of Labor;

the health plan employer data and information set published by the National Committee for Quality Assurance;

practice standards adopted by the American Academy of Pediatrics, American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, American Diabetes Association, American Cancer Society, American Academy of Family Physicians, American College of Physicians, United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, or the National Asthma Education and Prevention Program;

the compendium of animal rabies prevention and control published by the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;

the control of communicable diseases manual published by the American Public Health Association;

the standards manual and interpretative guidelines for behavioral health, employment and community support services, and for medical rehabilitation published by the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitative Facilities;

consumer assessment of health plans published by the Agency for Health Care Policy and Research;

resources for optimal care of the injured patient published by the Committee on Trauma, American College of Surgeons;

a document related to a resuscitation protocol that is published, compiled, or prepared based on the recommendations from the International Liaison Committee on Resuscitation;

the preferred drug list adopted by the department under AS

47.07.065(b)

; or

a prior authorization medications list under a state program permitted under 42 U.S.C. 1396r-8 (Title XIX, Social Security Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 20 SLA 2002; am § 68 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2012; am § 5 ch 18 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For federal poverty guidelines, see https://aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

Administrative Code. —

For trauma centers and trauma registry, see 7 AAC 26, art. 7.

For control of diseases of public health importance, see 7 AAC 27, art. 1.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For physician services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 2.

For hospital services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 5.

For children’s services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 6.

For visual care services and dispensing, see 7 AAC 43, art. 13.

For family planning services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 21.

For other services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 26.

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

For public health services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective June 3, 2003, inserted “prevention and” and “, 2002,” in paragraph (9).

The 2006 amendment, effective July 1, 2006, deleted “2002” following “prevention and control” in paragraph (9).

The 2012 amendment, effective August 22, 2012, added (14) and made a related stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment, effective August 9, 2019, added (15) and (16) and made related stylistic changes.

Sec. 47.05.015.
Contracts.

The department may contract with a person or local government for the delivery of services to be provided by the department under AS

47.05.010

if the commissioner determines the service will be provided at less cost to the state or will be provided in a more effective manner.

Services that may be provided by contract under this section include accepting applications for assistance, conducting interviews, making eligibility determinations, and issuing benefits, but do not include adoption of program standards or other matters involving the exercise of agency discretion.

A contract authorized under this section is exempt from the competitive bid requirements of AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code). In awarding a contract under this section the department shall request proposals in accordance with regulations of the Department of Administration under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

This section does not limit the authority provided by law for the department to contract for the delivery of services other than those provided under AS

47.05.010

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 138 SLA 1982; am § 57 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For medical transportation and accommodation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 9.

For other services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 26.

For durable medical equipment and medical supplies; related services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 33.

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

For residential child care facility grants, see 7 AAC 53, art. 5.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Sec. 47.05.017.
Home care providers.

State money may not be used for a home care provider unless criminal history record information as permitted by P.L. 105-277 and AS 12.62 is requested for the provider within 10 business days after the provider is hired to provide the care and is reviewed within five business days after it is received. The department shall require the grantee or contractor to do the information request and review required under this subsection for a home care provider employed by a person who has a grant or contract from the department to provide home care services.

The department shall adopt regulations identifying actions that it will take, in addition to those otherwise required under AS 47.17 and AS 47.24, when a report of harm is made under AS 47.17 or AS 47.24 that might relate to harm caused by actions or inactions of a public home care provider. The regulations must

address circumstances under which the department will, or will require a contractor or grantee to, reassign, suspend, or terminate a person alleged to have perpetrated harm;

include appropriate procedural safeguards to protect the due process rights of public home care providers who may be reassigned, suspended, or terminated under the circumstances described in (1) of this subsection; and

if the home care provider is a certified nurse aide, include procedures under which the department shall notify the Board of Nursing if the nurse aide is suspected of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property.

In this section, “public home care provider” means a person who is paid by the state, or by an entity that has contracted with the state or received a grant from state funds, to provide homemaker services, chore services, personal care services, home health care services, or similar services in or around a client’s private residence or to provide respite care in either the client’s residence or the caregiver’s residence or facility.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1994; am § 9 ch 2 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

P.L. 105-277, division A, Sec. 101(b) (title I, Sec. 124(a)), 112 Stat. 2681-50, 2681-73, provided that: “A nursing facility or home health care agency may submit a request to the Attorney General to conduct a search and exchange of [criminal history records corresponding to the fingerprints or other identification information submitted] regarding an applicant for employment if the employment position is involved in direct patient care.”

Administrative Code. —

For consumer-directed and agency-based personal care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 19.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective April 24, 2004, in subsection (a), substituted “criminal history record information as permitted by P.L. 105-277 and AS 12.62 is” for “records under AS 12.62.035(a) are” and made related changes in the first sentence, and substituted “information” for “records” in the second sentence.

Sec. 47.05.020.
Regulations concerning records; disclosure of information.

The power of the department to adopt regulations includes the power to adopt and enforce reasonable regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications of the department. The regulations must provide that financial information concerning an eligibility determination of a person applying for or receiving cash assistance, a diversion payment, or self-sufficiency services under the Alaska temporary assistance program shall be disclosed to a legislator on request of the legislator in connection with official purposes within the scope of the legislator’s legislative functions and related to the administration of the program consistent with federal law. When, under the law, names and addresses of recipients of public assistance are furnished to or held by another agency or department of government, the agency or department of government shall adopt regulations necessary to prevent the publication of the lists or their use for purposes not directly connected with the administration of public assistance and legislative functions. A legislator to whom information relating to the Alaska temporary assistance program is disclosed under this section may not further disclose the information except to another legislator and then only in connection with official purposes within each legislator’s legislative functions and related to the administration of the program consistent with federal law.

In addition to any access to public assistance records authorized under (a) of this section, the department shall provide a copy of a public assistance record prepared or maintained by or on behalf of the department to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, upon the request of the respective agency. If the record is in an electronic data base, the department shall provide the requesting agency with either access to the data base, or a copy of the information in the data base and a statement certifying its contents. The agency receiving the information under this subsection may use the information only for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 51-1-3(n) ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1951; am § 33 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 145 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 7 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For catastrophic illness, see 7 AAC 48, art. 1.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of (b) of this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Collateral references. —

Communications to social worker as privileged. 50 ALR3d 563.

Confidentiality of records as to recipients of public welfare. 54 ALR3d 768.

Sec. 47.05.030.
Misuse of public assistance lists and records.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section and for purposes directly connected with the administration of general assistance, adult public assistance, the day care assistance program authorized under AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

, or the Alaska temporary assistance program, and in accordance with the regulations of the department, a person may not solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, or authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of, a list of or names of, or information concerning, persons applying for or receiving the assistance directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the department or subdivisions or agencies of the department, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

It is not a violation of (a) of this section for the department or an employee of the department to disclose to a legislator, or for a legislator to solicit, receive, or make use of, financial information concerning an eligibility determination of a person applying for or receiving cash assistance, a diversion payment, or self-sufficiency services under the Alaska temporary assistance program if the disclosure, solicitation, receipt, and use are for official purposes in connection with the legislator’s official functions and related to the administration of the program consistent with federal law. Information provided to a legislator under this subsection shall remain confidential and may not be further disclosed except as provided in AS

47.05.020

.

It is not a violation of (a) of this section for the department or an employee of the department to disclose information to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, if the receiving agency requests the information only for purposes authorized under AS

47.05.020

.

History.

(§ 51-1-3(o) ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1951; am § 56 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 272 SLA 1976; am §§ 34, 35 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 146 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 74 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 8 ch 69 SLA 2002; am E.O. No. 108 § 9 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

” was substituted for “AS

47.25.001

— 47.25.009” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.25.002 — 47.25.009.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

In 2016, in subsection (a), “and (c)” was added following ‘‘provided in (b)’’ to correct a manifest error of omission in ch. 87, SLA 1997.

Administrative Code. —

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

For medical transportation and accommodation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 9.

For catastrophic illness, see 7 AAC 48, art. 1.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of (c) of this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sec. 47.05.032.
Disclosures to legislators.

A legislator to whom confidential information is disclosed under AS

47.05.020

—

47.05.030

is not subject to a penalty for further disclosure of the information unless, at the time the information was provided to the legislator, the legislator was given written notification that the material was confidential.

History.

(§ 36 ch 107 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

Sec. 47.05.040.
Consent to conditions of federal programs.

In order to take advantage of the training grants provisions of 42 U.S.C. 301 — 1397f (Social Security Act), as amended, the state, through the department, consents and agrees to all conditions required by federal statute and regulation necessary for the state to participate fully in the training grants or other programs.

History.

(§ 4 ch 133 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

For common medicaid eligibility requirements, see 7 AAC 100, art. 1.

Sec. 47.05.050.
Cooperation with federal government.

It is the public policy of the state to cooperate and coordinate with the United States government and its agencies in providing for and administering federal and state laws for adult public assistance and the other assistance that is provided for or extended to the people of the state.

History.

(§ 51-1-4 ACLA 1949; am § 12 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For program participation — administrative remedies and sanctions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 27.

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

Sec. 47.05.055.
Certified nurse aides.

If the department has reason to believe that a certified nurse aide employed in a facility licensed by the department under AS 47.32 as a hospital or nursing home has committed abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property in connection with the person’s duties as a certified nurse aide at the facility, the department shall investigate the matter. The department shall conduct proceedings to determine whether a finding of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property should be made. These proceedings shall be conducted under AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

. A finding under this subsection that a certified nurse aide has committed abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property shall be reported by the department to the Board of Nursing.

If the certified nurse aide is employed in a skilled nursing facility or nursing facility, other than an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, that is participating in the Medicaid or Medicare program, only the state survey and certification agency may make, and report to the Board of Nursing, a finding that a certified nurse aide has committed abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property in connection with the nurse aide’s employment at the facility.

History.

(§ 10 ch 2 SLA 1998; am § 18 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 14 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, in subsection (a) substituted “under AS 47.32 as a hospital or nursing home” for “under AS 18.20” and made a stylistic change.

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (b), substituted “persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities” for “the mentally retarded”.

Sec. 47.05.060.
Purpose and policy relating to children.

The purpose of this title as it relates to children is to secure for each child the care and guidance, preferably in the child’s own home, that will serve the moral, emotional, mental, and physical welfare of the child and the best interests of the community; to preserve and strengthen the child’s family ties unless efforts to preserve and strengthen the ties are likely to result in physical or emotional damage to the child, removing the child from the custody of the parents only as a last resort when the child’s welfare or safety or the protection of the public cannot be adequately safeguarded without removal; and, when the child is removed from the family, to secure for the child adequate custody and care and adequate planning for permanent placement of the child. It is the policy of the state to acknowledge and take into account the principles of early childhood and youth brain development and, whenever possible, consider the concepts of early adversity, toxic stress, childhood trauma, and the promotion of resilience through protective relationships, supports, self-regulation, and services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 152 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 29 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 75 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added the last sentence.

Sec. 47.05.065.
Legislative findings related to children.

The legislature finds that

parents have the following rights and responsibilities relating to the care and control of their child while the child is a minor:

the responsibility to provide the child with food, clothing, shelter, education, and medical care;

the right and responsibility to protect, nurture, train, and discipline the child, including the right to direct the child’s medical care and the right to exercise reasonable corporal discipline;

the right to determine where and with whom the child shall live;

the right and responsibility to make decisions of legal or financial significance concerning the child;

the right to obtain representation for the child in legal actions; and

the responsibility to provide special safeguards and care, including appropriate prenatal and postnatal protection for the child;

it is the policy of the state to strengthen families and to protect children from child abuse and neglect; the state recognizes that, in some cases, protection of a child may require removal of the child from the child’s home; however,

except in those cases involving serious risk to a child’s health or safety, the Department of Health and Social Services should provide time-limited family support services to the child and the child’s family in order to offer parents the opportunity to remedy parental conduct or conditions in the home that placed the child at risk of harm so that a child may return home safely and permanently; and

the state also recognizes that when a child is removed from the home, visitation between the child and the child’s parents or guardian and family members reduces the trauma for the child and enhances the likelihood that the child will be able to return home; therefore, whenever a child is removed from the parental home, the Department of Health and Social Services should encourage frequent, regular, and reasonable visitation of the child with the child’s parent or guardian and family members;

it is the policy of the state to recognize that, when a child is a ward of the state, the child is entitled to reasonable safety, adequate care, and adequate treatment and that the Department of Health and Social Services as legal custodian and the child’s guardian ad litem as guardian of the child’s best interests and their agents and assignees, each should make reasonable efforts to ensure that the child is provided with reasonable safety, adequate care, and adequate treatment for the duration of time that the child is a ward of the state;

it is in the best interests of a child who has been removed from the child’s own home for the state to apply the following principles in resolving the situation:

the child should be placed in a safe, secure, and stable environment;

the child should not be moved unnecessarily;

a planning process should be followed to lead to permanent placement of the child;

every effort should be made to encourage psychological attachment between the adult caregiver and the child;

frequent, regular, and reasonable visitation with the parent or guardian and family members should be encouraged;

parents and guardians must actively participate in family support services so as to facilitate the child’s being able to remain in the home; when children are removed from the home, the parents and guardians must actively participate in family support services to make return of their children to the home possible; and

to the extent practicable, the Department of Health and Social Services should enable a child’s contact with previous out-of-home caregivers when appropriate and in the best interests of the child;

numerous studies establish that

children undergo a critical attachment process before the time they reach six years of age;

a child who has not attached with an adult caregiver during this critical stage will suffer significant emotional damage that frequently leads to chronic psychological problems and antisocial behavior when the child reaches adolescence and adulthood; and

it is important to provide for an expedited placement procedure to ensure that all children, especially those under the age of six years, who have been removed from their homes are placed in permanent homes expeditiously.

History.

(§ 14 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 22(a), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, added (4)(G) and made related changes.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal
2201.